Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1412
Law enforcement officer; handgun proficiency; records.

(1) In order to maintain proficiency in handgun operation, a law enforcement officer shall qualify at least once every calendar year with a handgun of the same make and model as the handgun which is the primary handgun to be carried by the law enforcement officer while on duty. Such qualification shall take place on a handgun shooting course submitted by the director and approved by the council.

(2) Qualification on a handgun shooting course shall be conducted by a qualified firearm instructor pursuant to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the council. Law enforcement agencies that do not have a qualified firearm instructor may share qualification with other law enforcement agencies that have a qualified firearm instructor or may utilize the Nebraska Association of Law Enforcement Firearm Instructors which may, at no cost, assist such law enforcement agencies by supplying a qualified firearm instructor for a handgun shooting course. The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for requalification for the case in which a law enforcement officer fails to qualify. The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations that address the status of a law enforcement officer and his or her limitations, if any, if the law enforcement officer fails the handgun qualification. The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations whereby the council may grant a waiver of the handgun qualification and determine the status and, if any, limitations of, a law enforcement officer in cases in which the law enforcement officer demonstrates an extreme hardship.

(3) Each law enforcement agency shall maintain its own records as to the handgun qualifications of its law enforcement officers.

Laws 1996, LB 1055, § 13;

Laws 1999, LB 205, § 2.